Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB653.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1305.2-B. Panic alerts.(a) Requirement.--Each public school building in this Commonwealth must be equipped with a panic alert system for use in a school security emergency, including, but not limited to, a nonfire evacuation, lockdown or active shooter situation. The panic alert must be directly linked to the local law enforcement agencies designated as first responders to the school's campus 12345678910111213141516171819 and must immediately transmit a signal or message to those authorities on activation.(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Panic alert." A silent security system notification generated by the manual activation of a device, including a mobile or computer application, wired panic button or wireless panic button, intended to communicate a life-threatening or emergency situation that requires a response from law enforcement."Public school building." All buildings on a public elementary, middle or high school campus where instruction takes place. The term includes all locations where students are present during the school day.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0653PN0662 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516